Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-169
Board; organization.

Each board shall organize annually at its first meeting subsequent to December 1 and shall select a chairperson, a vice-chairperson, and a secretary from its own membership.

Laws 1927, c. 167, § 20, p. 459;

C.S.1929, § 71-310;

R.S.1943, § 71-120;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 24;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-120;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 69.